Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.060

Form, filing of marketing agreement, order, amendment, and other proceedings.

The director shall cause any marketing agreement, order proposed for issuance, or amendment to be set out in detailed form and reduced to writing, which writing is herein designated "proposal." The director shall make and maintain on file in the office of the department a copy of each proposal and a full and complete record of all notices, hearings, findings, decisions, assents, and all other proceedings relating to each proposal and to each marketing agreement and order.

[ 2002 c 313 s 6; 1961 c 256 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.